California statutes. Education Code
(5) The pupil’s academic data and any other information relevant to making an informed decision on whether to accept the exemption from local graduation requirements.

(b) If a county office of education determines that a juvenile court school pupil is reasonably able to complete the local graduation requirements after the pupil’s fourth year of high school, the county office of education shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil regarding the pupil’s option to remain in school after the pupil’s fourth year to complete the local graduation requirements.

(2) Consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, about how remaining in school after the pupil’s fourth year to complete the local graduation requirements will affect the pupil’s ability to gain admission to an institution of higher
 education.

(3) Consult with and provide information to the pupil about transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(4) Permit the pupil to stay in school after the pupil’s fourth year to complete the local graduation requirements upon agreement with the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, upon agreement with the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil.

(c) A juvenile court school pupil who is eligible for the exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5 and who would otherwise be entitled to remain in attendance at the school shall not be required to
 accept the exemption or be denied enrollment in, or the ability to complete, courses for which the pupil is otherwise eligible, including courses necessary to attend an institution of higher education, regardless of whether those courses are required for statewide graduation requirements.

(d) (1) If a juvenile court school pupil who is eligible for an exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5 is not exempted or if the pupil or the education rights holder, as applicable, has previously deferred or declined an exemption pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) or subdivision (c), a county office of education shall grant an exemption within 30 days if it is requested by the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, by the
 education rights holder.

(2) If a juvenile court school pupil is eligible for an exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5, a county office of education shall not revoke that
 eligibility.

(3) If a former juvenile court school pupil is eligible for an exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5, that right shall continue to apply after the termination of the court’s jurisdiction over the pupil.

(e) A county office of education shall not require or request a juvenile court school pupil to transfer schools in order to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(f) A juvenile court school pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, the pupil’s social worker, and the pupil’s probation officer shall not request a transfer solely to qualify the pupil for an exemption pursuant to this
 section.

(g) (1) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this section may be filed with the county office of education under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a county office of education may appeal the decision to the department pursuant to Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations and shall receive a written decision regarding the appeal within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(3) If a county office of education finds merit in a
 complaint, or if the Superintendent finds merit in an appeal, the county office of education shall provide a remedy to the affected pupil.

(4) Information regarding the requirements of this section shall be included in the annual notification distributed to, among others, pupils, parents or guardians of pupils, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(h) If a county office of education determines that a juvenile court school pupil is not reasonably able to complete the local graduation requirements after the pupil’s fourth year of high school, but is reasonably able to complete the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 after the pupil’s fourth year of high school, the county
 office of education shall exempt the pupil from the local graduation requirements and provide the pupil the option to remain in school to complete the statewide coursework requirements. The county office of education shall consult with the pupil and the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil regarding all of the following:

(1) The pupil’s option to remain in school to complete the statewide coursework requirements.

(2) How waiving the local educational requirements and remaining in school may affect the pupil’s postsecondary education or vocation plans, including the ability to gain admission to an institution of higher education.

(3) Whether any other options are available to the pupil, including,
 but not limited to, possible credit recovery, and any transfer opportunities available through the California Community Colleges.

(4) The pupil’s academic data and any other information relevant to making an informed decision on whether to accept the exemption and option to remain in school to complete the statewide coursework requirements.

(i) (1) If a juvenile court school pupil is not eligible for an exemption from local graduation requirements pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48645.5 in the pupil’s third year of high school, because a county office of education makes a finding that the pupil is reasonably able to complete the local educational agency’s graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth
 year of high school, a county office of education shall reevaluate eligibility in the pupil’s next academic year and provide written notice to the pupil, the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil, and the pupil’s social worker and probation officer, if applicable, whether the pupil qualifies for an exemption within the first 30 calendar days of the pupil’s next academic year, based on the course completion status of the pupil at the time of reevaluation to determine if the pupil continues to be reasonably able to complete the local graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school.

(2) If it is determined within the first 30 calendar days of the pupil’s next academic year, that given their course completion status at the time of the
 reevaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) the pupil is not reasonably able to complete the local graduation requirements in time to graduate from high school by the end of the pupil’s fourth year of high school, the county office of education shall provide the pupil with the option to receive an exemption from all local graduation requirements that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3 or to stay in school after the pupil’s fourth year
 to complete the local graduation requirements upon agreement with the pupil, if the pupil is 18 years of age or older, or, if the pupil is under 18 years of age, upon agreement with the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil and provide notification of the availability of these options pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b).

(3) If the pupil stays in high school after the fourth year, the county shall reevaluate eligibility at least annually within 30 calendar days of the beginning of the pupil’s subsequent academic years.

(j) If a county office of education offers to exempt a juvenile court school pupil from local graduation requirements that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements specified in Section 51225.3, it
 is in the sole discretion of the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the pupil or the pupil themselves if they are 18 years of age or older whether to accept, defer, or decline the exemption, based on the pupil’s best educational interests.

(k) Each county office of education shall report to the department annually on the number of court school pupils who, for the prior school year, graduated with an exemption from the local graduation requirements that are in addition to the statewide coursework requirements. This data shall be reported for court school pupils graduating in the fourth year cohort or in subsequent year cohorts, and shall be
 disaggregated by cohort, race, and disability status. The department shall make this data publicly available on an annual basis aligned with other reporting timelines for the California School Dashboard graduation data.

(l) For the purposes of this section, “local graduation requirements” means the coursework and other requirements for high school graduation adopted by the county board of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 703, Sec. 2.   (AB 2181)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48646.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all pupils, including the state’s justice-involved youth, have access to their constitutional right of a free and appropriate public education, and to reduce barriers incarcerated pupils may have to academic supports, career and college preparatory pathways, and higher education.

 (b) The Legislature encourages each county superintendent of schools or governing board of a school district, as determined by the county board of education pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 48645.2, and the county chief probation officer to enter into a memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement to support a collaborative process for meeting the needs of wards of the court who are receiving their education in juvenile court
 schools. The memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement may include, but is not limited to, a process for communication, decisionmaking, mutually established goals, and conflict resolution. The purpose of this memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement is to develop a collaborative model that will foster an educational and residential environment that nurtures the whole child and consistently supports services that will meet the educational needs of the pupils.

(c) A memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement on providing educational and related services for juvenile court school pupils developed in accordance with this section may include, but is not limited to, the following provisions:

(1) Mutually developed goals and objectives that are reviewed annually, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Building resiliency and strengthening life skills.

(B) Fostering prosocial attitudes and behaviors.

(C) Assigning pupils to appropriate classrooms based on their educational needs.

(D) Ensuring regular classroom attendance.

(E) Providing clean, safe, and appropriate educational facilities.

(F) Improving academic achievement and vocational preparation.

(2) Clear delineation of responsibilities among the educational and residential or custodial service providers.

(3) A process for communicating,
 collaborating, and resolving conflicts. Whenever possible, resolution of issues shall be reached by consensus through a collaborative process that would promote decisionmaking at the site where services are delivered. A working group charged with this responsibility may be appointed by the county superintendent of schools, or the superintendent of the school district with responsibility for providing juvenile court school services, and the county chief probation officer, or their designees. The working group is responsible for establishing and maintaining open communication, collaboration, and resolution of issues that arise.

(4) A clearly identified mechanism for resolving conflicts.

(d) If a memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement is agreed to pursuant to this section, it shall include both of the following:

(1) A joint process for performing an intake evaluation for each ward to determine educational needs and ability to participate in all educational settings within two business days, or under extraordinary circumstances up to five business days, of the ward entering the local juvenile facility. The process shall recognize the limitations on academic evaluation and planning that can result from short-term placements. The evaluation team shall include staff from the responsible educational agency and the county probation department, and may include other participants as appropriate, and as mutually agreed upon by the education and probation members of the team. The evaluation process specified in the memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement may:

(A) Include a timeline for evaluation once a ward is assigned to a local facility.

(B) (i) Result in an educational plan for a ward while assigned to a local juvenile facility that is integrated with other rehabilitative and behavioral management programs, and that supports the educational needs of the pupil.

(ii) It is the intent that this shared information about each ward placed in a juvenile court school shall assist both the county superintendent of schools and the county chief probation officer in meeting the needs of wards in their care and promoting a system of comprehensive services.

(2) A transition plan for when the ward reenrolls at a local educational agency postplacement that shall be transferred to the postplacement local educational agency within two business days of the youth being enrolled in the postplacement local educational agency.

(e) A memorandum of understanding or
 equivalent mutual agreement pursuant to this section shall not cede responsibility or authority prescribed by statute or regulation from one party to another party unless mutually agreed upon by both parties.

(f) A memorandum of understanding or equivalent mutual agreement pursuant to this section shall be posted on the internet webpage of the county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 51.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48647.

(a) Local educational agencies are strongly encouraged to enter into memoranda of understanding and create joint policies, systems, including data sharing systems, transition centers, and other joint structures that will allow for the immediate transfer of educational records, create uniform systems for calculating and awarding course credit, and allow for the immediate enrollment of pupils transferring from juvenile court schools.

(b) As part of their existing responsibilities for coordinating education and services for youth in the juvenile justice system, the county office of education and county probation department shall have a joint transition planning policy that includes
 collaboration with relevant local educational agencies to improve communication
 regarding dates of release and the educational needs of pupils who have had contact with the juvenile justice system, to coordinate immediate school placement and enrollment, and to ensure that probation officers in the community have the information they need to support the return of pupils who are being transferred from juvenile court schools to public schools in their communities.

(c) As part of the joint transition planning policy required under subdivision (b), the county office of education shall assign transition oversight responsibilities to existing county office of education personnel who will work in collaboration with the county probation department, as needed, and relevant local educational agencies to ensure all of the following:

(1) The transfer of complete and accurate education records, including the pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable,
 within 72 hours of the pupil’s release from the juvenile detention facility.

(2) Access to information about postsecondary academic and vocational opportunities, including college financial aid programs.

(3) The implementation of the pupil’s transition plan, if one exists.

(d) As part of the joint transition planning policy required under subdivision (b), the county office of education personnel assigned transition oversight responsibilities shall work in collaboration with the county probation department, as needed, and relevant local educational agencies to facilitate all of the
 following:

(1) The immediate enrollment in an appropriate public school in their community when a pupil is transferred from the juvenile court school.

(2) The acceptance, upon enrollment by the pupil in a public school, of course credits, including partial
 credits, for coursework completed in the juvenile court school, pursuant to subdivision
 (b) of Section 51225.2.

(3) The immediate placement in appropriate courses, based on coursework completed by the pupil, pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 51225.2.

(4) The transfer of complete and accurate education records, including the pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and the pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable, when a pupil enters the juvenile court school.

(e) Each pupil detained for more than 20 consecutive schooldays shall have an individualized transition plan developed by the county office of education in
 collaboration with the county probation department, as needed. The individualized transition plan shall be developed before the pupil’s release and reviewed and revised as needed, and shall address, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) The academic, behavioral, social-emotional, and career needs of the pupil.

(2) The identification and engagement of programs, including higher education programs, services, and individuals to support a pupil’s successful transition into and out of the juvenile detention facility.

(f) Each pupil detained for more than 20 consecutive schooldays shall have all of the following accessible to the holder of the educational rights for that pupil upon the pupil’s release from the juvenile detention facility: 

(1) School transcripts.

(2) The pupil’s individualized learning plan, if applicable. For purposes of this section, an individualized learning plan is a plan developed collaboratively by a pupil and school personnel that identifies academic and career goals and how the pupil will progress toward meeting those goals.

(3) The pupil’s individualized education program adopted pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), if applicable.

(4) The pupil’s plan adopted pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794(a)), if applicable.

(5) Any academic and vocational assessments.

(6) An analysis of credits completed and needed.

(7) Any certificates or diplomas earned by the pupil.

(g) For each pupil detained for 20 consecutive schooldays or fewer, a copy of the pupil’s individualized learning plan, if one exists, shall be made available by the county office of education to the pupil upon the pupil’s release, if possible.

(h) The county office of education, in collaboration, as needed, with the county probation department, shall establish procedures for the timely, accurate, complete, and confidential
 transfer of educational records in compliance with state and federal law. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, this section applies to juvenile court schools that are operated by, or as, charter schools. As used in this section, “county office of education” includes a charter school that serves juvenile court school pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 756, Sec. 2.   (AB 1354)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

48648.

(a) Commencing with the 2024–25 fiscal year, the department shall annually report all of the following on its internet website:

(1) The number and percentage of pupils who leave juvenile court schools or county community schools at any point in a given academic year, who did not earn a high school diploma or a high school equivalency by the end of that academic year, and
 who enroll back into a school district or charter school the following academic year.

(2) The number and percentage of pupils who leave juvenile court schools or county community
 schools at any point in a given academic year, who do not earn
 a high school diploma or a high school equivalency by the end of that academic year, and who do not enroll back into a school district or charter school the following academic year.

(3) Juvenile court school or county community school pupil access to A–G approved courses, high school equivalency tests, accredited
 college
 coursework, and the number and percentage of pupils who satisfy the A–G course requirements needed to be eligible for admission to the University of California or the California State University.

(4) A statewide summary of outcomes aligned with the California School Dashboard indicators for pupils served by county office of education alternative schools, with the ability to display information by all juvenile court schools, or by all county community schools.

(b) The information reported by the department pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be available at the statewide, county, and school levels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 998, Sec. 16.   (AB 176)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

48649.

(a) The department shall, within existing resources, enter into a contract for an independent evaluation of county juvenile court and county community schools. On or before November 1, 2025, the Superintendent shall, within existing resources, provide a report of the evaluation to the chairs of the relevant policy committees and budget subcommittees of the Legislature, the executive director of the state board or their designee, and the Director of Finance. The evaluation shall include all of the following:

(1) An analysis of state and federal funding available to support pupils enrolled in county juvenile court schools and county community schools.

(2) The availability and transparency of pupil- and school-level outcome data available for county juvenile court schools and county community schools.

(3) County juvenile court school and county community school pupil enrollment and demographic trends, including:

(A) Enrollment projections.

(B) The impacts of recent changes to pupil expulsion policies, including recent changes to Sections 48900, 48901.1, and 48915.

(C) The impacts of the closure of all California Division of Juvenile Justice facilities pursuant Senate Bill 92 of the 2021–22 Regular Session on county office of education programs.

(D) Recommendations for how the state may collect and utilize pupil- and school-level data related to justice-involved youth as a demographic subgroup, as these youth often make frequent moves between local educational agencies.

(4) A representative sample and summary of cost-sharing agreements between county offices of education and county probation departments or other relevant county agencies related to the operation of county juvenile court schools.

(b) The report required to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 194, Sec. 15.   (SB 141)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

48650.

(a) (1) The Superintendent shall convene a workgroup on meeting the needs of pupils with disabilities who enroll in juvenile court schools operated by county offices of education.

(2) The workgroup shall include, but not be limited to, representatives of county offices education, school districts, charter schools, county probation, county behavioral health, special education local plan areas, regional centers, former pupils of county juvenile court schools and county community schools, staff from the appropriate fiscal subcommittees and policy committees of the Legislature, staff from the state board, and relevant state and national juvenile court school and federal
 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) policy experts.

(3) The workgroup shall examine existing law and current practices regarding the education of pupils with disabilities enrolled in county juvenile court schools and county community schools and make recommendations on improvements regarding all the following, specific to the county juvenile court school setting:

(A) Child find procedures, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.

(B) Referral for, and provision of, timely evaluation, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.

(C) Timely transfer of pupil records
 to and from county juvenile court schools, including individualized education programs (IEPs).

(D) Provision of education and related services, as required by pupils’ IEPs.

(E) Provision of education in the least restrictive environment, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act.

(F) Staffing of special education certificated and classified positions serving pupils with disabilities, including participation in state educator workforce initiatives.

(G) Implementation of Section 48645.7, transition planning required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, and provision for alternate pathways to earn a diploma for pupils
 with disabilities.

(H) Family support and dispute prevention and resolution, as required by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and state law.

(I) Transition planning for pupils with disabilities moving to educational placements after leaving county juvenile court schools and county community day schools.

(J) Compliance monitoring of special education in county juvenile court schools and county community schools.

(K) Coordination and collaboration between county offices and other agencies, including, but not limited to, county probation departments, county courts, county child welfare agencies, county behavioral health care programs, and
 regional centers.

(4) To the extent practicable, the workgroup shall leverage the findings related to foster youth pursuant to Assembly Bill 2083 of the 2017–18 Regular Session.

(b) On or before February 25, 2025, the department shall submit a report with findings and recommendations regarding the topics identified in subdivision (a) to the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature, the state board, and the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 194, Sec. 16.   (SB 141)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Community Day Schools [48660. - 48666.]

48660.

(a) The governing board of a school district may establish one or more community day schools for pupils who meet one or more of the conditions described in subdivision (b) of Section 48662. A community day school may serve pupils in any of kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, or the same or lesser included range of grades as may be found in an individual middle or junior high school operated by the school district. If a school district is organized as a school district that serves kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, but no higher grades, the governing board of the school district may establish a community day school for any kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, upon a two-thirds vote of the
 governing board of the school district. It is the intent of the Legislature, that to the extent possible, the governing board of a school district operating a community day school for any of kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, separate younger pupils from older pupils within that community day school.

(b) The average daily attendance of a community day school shall be determined by dividing the total number of days of attendance in all full school months, by a divisor of 70 in the first period of each fiscal year, by a divisor of 135 in the second period of each fiscal year, and by a divisor of 180 at the annual time of each fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 923, Sec. 41.   (SB 971)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

48660.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts operating community day schools to the extent possible include the following program components:

(a) School district cooperation with the county office of education, law enforcement, probation, and human services agencies personnel who work with at-promise youth.

(b) Low pupil-teacher ratio.

(c) Individualized instruction and assessment.

(d) Maximum collaboration with school district support service resources, including, but not
 limited to, school counselors and psychologists, academic counselors, and pupil discipline personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 11.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

48661.

(a) A community day school shall not be situated on the same site as an elementary, middle, junior high, comprehensive senior high, opportunity, or continuation school, except as follows:

(1) When the governing board of a school district with 2,500 or fewer units of average daily attendance reported for the most recent second principal apportionment certifies by a two-thirds vote of its membership that satisfactory alternative facilities are not available for a community day school.

(2) When the governing board of a school district that is organized as a district to serve kindergarten and grades 1 to 8, inclusive, but no higher grades, certifies by a two-thirds vote of its membership that satisfactory alternative facilities are not available for a community day school.

(3) When the governing board of a school district that desires to operate a community day school to serve any of kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, but no higher grades, certifies by a two-thirds vote of its membership that satisfactory alternative facilities are not available for a community day school.

(b) A certification made pursuant to this section is valid for not more than one school year and may be renewed by a subsequent two-thirds vote of the governing board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 646, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

48662.

(a) The governing board of a school district that establishes a community day school shall adopt policies that provide procedures for the involuntary transfer of pupils to a community day school.

(b) A pupil may be assigned to a community day school only if he or she meets one or more of the following conditions:

(1) The pupil is expelled for any reason.

(2) The pupil is probation referred pursuant to Sections 300 and 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) The pupil is referred to a community day school by a school attendance review board or other district level referral process.

(4) First priority for assignment to a community day school shall be given to a pupil expelled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 48915, second priority shall be given to pupils expelled for any other reasons, and third priority shall be given for placement to all other pupils pursuant to this section, unless there is an agreement that the county superintendent of schools shall serve any of these pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 847, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

48663.

(a) The minimum schoolday in a community day school is 360 minutes of classroom instruction provided by a certificated employee of the district reporting the attendance of the pupils for apportionment funding.

(b) A pupil enrolled in a community day school may not generate more than one day of community day school attendance credit in a schoolday for any purpose.

(c) For the purposes of calculating the additional funding provided to a school district pursuant to Section 48664, only community day school attendance shall be reported in clock hours. Attendance of less than five clock hours in a schoolday shall be disregarded for purposes of Section 48664. Five clock hours of attendance in one schoolday shall be deemed to be one-half day of attendance, for purposes of additional funding pursuant to Section 48664. Six clock hours or more of attendance in one schoolday shall be deemed to be one day of attendance, for purposes of additional funding pursuant to Section 48664.

(d) Independent study may not be utilized as a means of providing any part of the minimum instructional day provided pursuant to subdivision (a).

(e) A community day school’s academic programs shall be comparable to those available to pupils of a similar age in the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 847, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

48666.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of a school district maintaining a community day school may establish attendance policies for the community day school that permit the community day school to require pupils to attend school for up to seven days each week when this action is taken as part of a directed program designed to provide community day pupils with the skills and attitudes necessary for success when returned to a regular school environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 974, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1996, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 974.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Attendance at Community College [48800. - 48813.]



  ARTICLE 1. Advanced Education [48800. - 48802.]

48800.

(a) The governing board of a school district may determine which pupils would benefit from advanced scholastic or vocational work. The intent of this section is to provide educational enrichment opportunities for a limited number of eligible pupils, rather than to reduce current course requirements of elementary and secondary schools, and also to help ensure a smoother transition from high school to college for pupils by providing them with greater exposure to the collegiate atmosphere. The governing board of a school district may authorize those pupils, upon recommendation of the principal of the pupil’s school of attendance, and with parental consent, to attend a community college during any session or term as special part-time or full-time students and to undertake one or more courses of instruction offered at the community
 college level.

(b) If the governing board of a school district denies a request for a special part-time or full-time enrollment at a community college for any session or term for a pupil who is identified as highly gifted, the governing board shall issue its written recommendation and the reasons for the denial within 60 days. The written recommendation and denial shall be issued at the next regularly scheduled board meeting that falls at least 30 days after the request has been submitted.

(c) A pupil shall receive credit for community college courses that the pupil completes at the level determined appropriate by the governing boards of the school district and community college district. Using available funding apportioned to the community college district pursuant to Section 84750.4, the governing board of the community college district shall report the pupil’s completed courses
 and grades received through eTranscript California, also referred to as “eTranscriptCA,” for purposes of enabling the uniform integration of the pupil’s completed courses and grades received into the pupil’s universal and electronic high school transcript that is housed on the CaliforniaColleges.edu platform.

(d) (1) The principal of a school may recommend a pupil for community college summer session only if that pupil meets both of the following criteria:

(A) Demonstrates adequate preparation in the discipline to be studied.

(B) Exhausts all opportunities to enroll in an equivalent course, if any, at the pupil’s school of attendance.

(2) For any particular grade level, a principal shall not recommend for community college summer
 session attendance more than 5 percent of the total number of pupils who completed that grade immediately before the time of recommendation.

(3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a high school pupil recommended by the pupil’s principal for enrollment in a course shall not be included in the 5-percent limitation of pupils allowed to be recommended pursuant to paragraph (2) if the course in which the pupil is enrolled is part of a College and Career Access Pathways (CCAP) program established pursuant to Section 76004 in which a majority of the pupils served are unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, the course meets one of the criteria listed in clauses (i) and (ii), and the high school principal who recommends the pupil for enrollment provides the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, upon the request of that office, with the data required for purposes of paragraph (5).

(i) The course is a lower division, college-level course for credit that is designated as part of the California General Education Transfer Curriculum.

(ii) The course is a college-level, occupational course for credit assigned a priority code of “A,” “B,” or “C,” pursuant to the Student Accountability Model, as defined by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and reported in the management information system, and the course is part of a sequence of vocational or career technical education courses leading to a degree or certificate in the subject area covered by the sequence.

(B) The 5-percent limitation of pupils allowed to be recommended pursuant to paragraph (2) shall apply to all physical education courses.

(4) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a high school pupil recommended by the pupil’s principal for enrollment in a course shall not be included in the 5-percent limitation of pupils allowed to be recommended pursuant to paragraph (2) if the course in which the pupil is enrolled is either of the following:

(i) A lower division, college-level course for credit that is designated as part of the California General Education Transfer Curriculum.
